Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5681.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
Sec. 9. (1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, if a
patient or his or her the authorized representative of the patient
makes a request for a copy of all or part of his or her the
patient's medical record under section 5, the health care provider,
health facility, or medical records company to which the request is
directed may charge the patient or his or her the authorized
representative of the patient a fee that is not more than the
following amounts:
(a) An initial fee of $20.00 $32.08 per request for a copy of
EMR H04696'25 (H-1) htyprs


the record.
(b) Paper copies and electronic copies as follows:
(i) One dollar A fee of $1.60 per page for the first 20 pages.
(ii) Fifty cents A fee of 80 cents per page for pages 21
through 50.
(iii) Twenty cents A fee of 32 cents per page for pages 51 and
over.
(c) If the medical record is in some form or medium other than
paper, the actual cost of preparing a duplicate.
(c) (d) Any postage or shipping costs incurred by the health
care provider, health facility, or medical records company in
providing the copies.
(d) (e) Any actual costs incurred by the health care provider,
health facility, or medical records company in retrieving medical
records that are 7 years old or older and not maintained or
accessible on-site.
(2) A health care provider, health facility, or medical
records company may refuse to retrieve or copy all or part of a
medical record for a patient or his or her the authorized
representative of the patient until the applicable fee is paid.
(3) A health care provider, health facility, or medical
records company shall not charge a fee for retrieving, copying, or
mailing all or part of a medical record other than a fee allowed
under subsection (1). Except as otherwise provided in subsection
(4), a health care provider, health facility, or medical records
company shall waive all fees for a medically indigent individual.
The health care provider, health facility, or medical records
company may require the patient or his or her the authorized
representative of the patient to provide proof that the patient is
EMR H04696'25 (H-1) htyprs


a recipient of assistance as described in this subsection.
(4) A medically indigent individual that who receives copies
of medical records at no charge under subsection (3) is limited to
1 set of copies per health care provider, health facility, or
medical records company. Any additional requests for the same
records from the same health care provider, health facility, or
medical records company shall be are subject to the fee provisions
under subsection (1).
(5) Notwithstanding subsection (1), a health care provider,
health facility, or medical records company shall not charge a
patient an any of the following:
(a) An initial fee for his or her the patient's medical
record.
(b) The fee described in subdivision (1)(b), if the patient is
receiving an electronic copy of the patient's medical record.
(6) Beginning 2 years after the effective date of this act,
January 1, 2028, and by January 1 of each year thereafter, the
department of community health and human services shall adjust on
an annual basis the fees prescribed by subsection (1) by an amount
determined by the state treasurer to reflect the cumulative annual
percentage change in the Detroit consumer price index.Consumer
Price Index.
Final Page
EMR H04696'25 (H-1) htyprs